Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1112.01
Budget division; purpose.

The purpose of the budget division is to assist the Governor in the preparation of the Governor's state budget recommendations and in the administration of the approved state budget.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 38.